Washington statutes.
RCW 10.19.120

Actions not barred by defect of form or formality.

No action brought on any recognizance, bail, or appearance bond given in any criminal proceeding whatever shall be barred or defeated, nor shall judgment be arrested thereon, by reason of any neglect or omission to note or record the default of any principal or surety at the time when such default shall happen, or by reason of any defect in the form of the recognizance, if it sufficiently appear from the tenor thereof at what court or before what district judge the party or witness was bound to appear, and that the court or magistrate before whom it was taken was authorized by law to require and take such recognizance; and a recognizance may be recorded after execution awarded.

[ 1987 c 202 s 166; 1891 c 28 s 88; Code 1881 s 1167; 1854 p 129 s 176; RRS s 2235. FORMER PART OF SECTION: Code 1881 s 749; 1854 p 219 s 489; RRS s 777, now codified as RCW 19.72.170.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.